New York, session 2025-2026, A3209.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 9 of section 2402 of the surrogate's court 2 procedure act, as amended by section 30 of part J of chapter 62 of the 3 laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 4 9. For filing: 5 Fee Rate 6 (i) a demand for trial by jury in any proceeding, SCPA 7 502 .................................................... $150.00 8 (ii) objections to the probate of a will SCPA 1410 ............ 150.00 9 (iii) a note of issue in any proceeding ........................ 45.00 10 (iv) objection or answer in any action or proceeding 11 other than probate ..................................... 75.00 12 (v) [a will for safekeeping pursuant to section 2507 of 13 this act except that the court in any county may 14 reduce or dispense with such fee ....................... 45.00 15 (vi)] a bond, including any additional bond: 16 less than $10,000 ...................................... 20.00 17 $10,000 and over ....................................... 30.00 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06258-01-5